Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2511 (3) 91 sb/js/md H.F. 2511 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 463.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âCritical assetsâ includes all of the following: 3 a. Transportation assets and evacuation routes, including 4 airports, bridges, bus terminals, ports, major roadways, 5 highways, railways, marinas, rail facilities, and railroad 6 bridges. 7 b. Critical infrastructure, including wastewater treatment 8 facilities and lift stations, storm water treatment facilities 9 and pump stations, drinking water facilities, water utility 10 conveyance systems, electric production and supply facilities, 11 solid and hazardous waste facilities, military installations, 12 communications facilities, and disaster debris management 13 sites. 14 c. Critical community and emergency facilities, including 15 schools, colleges, universities, community centers, 16 correctional facilities, disaster recovery centers, emergency 17 medical service facilities, emergency operation centers, fire 18 stations, health care facilities, hospitals, law enforcement 19 facilities, local government facilities, logistical staging 20 areas, affordable public housing, risk shelter inventory, and 21 state government facilities. 22 d. Natural, cultural, and historical resources, including 23 agricultural lands, conservation lands, parks, shorelines, 24 surface waters, wetlands, and historical and cultural assets. 25 2. âRegionally significant assetsâ means critical assets 26 that support the needs of communities spanning multiple 27 geopolitical jurisdictions, including water resource 28 facilities, regional medical centers, emergency operations 29 centers, regional utilities, major transportation hubs and 30 corridors, airports, and seaports. 31 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 463.2 Iowa state resilience plan. 32 1. By December 31, 2028, the Iowa flood center established 33 under section 466C.1 shall develop and adopt an Iowa state 34 resilience plan in coordination with the department of 35 -1- HF 2511 (3) 91 sb/js/md 1/ 5 H.F. 2511 transportation, economic development authority, department 1 of homeland security and emergency management, department 2 of agriculture and land stewardship, department of natural 3 resources, and any other stakeholder deemed relevant by the 4 Iowa flood center. 5 2. The goals of the Iowa state resilience plan are to 6 accomplish the following: 7 a. Protect against the loss of life and property by 8 providing for hazard mitigation and long-term disaster 9 recovery. 10 b. Effectively incorporate future hazard, demographic, and 11 development conditions into all state programs addressing built 12 and natural infrastructure at risk from flooding, anticipated 13 changes in water supply, and other natural hazards. 14 c. Identify priority projects to increase resilience across 15 the state. 16 d. Establish a strategy to allocate state and federal 17 funding that support the execution of projects and goals 18 outlined in the plan. 19 e. Be a guide to state and local resilience policy. 20 3. The Iowa state resilience plan shall include all of the 21 following: 22 a. A statewide risk assessment that includes, to the extent 23 practicable, all of the following: 24 (1) A gap analysis of state and local government capacity 25 to adequately evaluate and address the factors that increase 26 hazard risk, including risks associated with flooding and 27 anticipated changes in water supply. 28 (2) Temporal, seasonal, and spatial variability projections 29 of at least thirty years for flooding, water supply, and the 30 other top natural hazards identified in the state hazard 31 mitigation plan. 32 (3) An analysis of local mitigation and post-disaster 33 redevelopment plans and their regional impact. 34 (4) An analysis of present and potential losses, including 35 -2- HF 2511 (3) 91 sb/js/md 2/ 5 H.F. 2511 all of the following: 1 (a) Land subsidence. 2 (b) Property inundation. 3 (c) Natural and built infrastructure failures. 4 (d) Natural resource degradation as a result of flooding. 5 (e) Anticipated changes in water supply. 6 (f) Other top natural hazards identified in the state hazard 7 mitigation plan. 8 (5) The economic impact of best available extreme weather 9 projections on the stateâs resources, including all of the 10 following: 11 (a) Forestry. 12 (b) Agriculture. 13 (c) Water. 14 (d) Soil health. 15 (e) Wildlife. 16 (f) Hunting. 17 (g) Other natural resources. 18 (h) Infrastructure. 19 (i) Economic productivity and security. 20 (j) Education. 21 (k) Public health. 22 (6) An analysis of historic and projected development in 23 known and projected hazard areas, including areas under threat 24 from flooding, anticipated changes in water supply, and other 25 top natural hazards identified in the state hazard mitigation 26 plan. 27 b. An inventory of critical assets, including regionally 28 significant assets, that includes an outline of each assetâs 29 condition, capacity, and present and potential losses from 30 flooding, anticipated changes in water supply, and the other 31 top natural hazards identified in the state hazard mitigation 32 plan. 33 c. A methodology for prioritizing both state-funded 34 resilience projects and projects funded by state-administered 35 -3- HF 2511 (3) 91 sb/js/md 3/ 5 H.F. 2511 federal programs. The methodology shall include: 1 (1) Consideration of project cobenefits, including 2 multihazard risk reduction, economic development, ecosystem 3 services, and tourism and recreational opportunities. 4 (2) Regional considerations, including demography, income, 5 geography, and proximity to critical assets. 6 (3) Consideration of upstream and downstream impacts of 7 riverine projects on communities and local ecology. 8 d. A prioritized list of all ongoing, planned, and proposed 9 resilience projects funded or administered by the state that 10 includes all of the following: 11 (1) The cost of each project. 12 (2) A quantification of the total funding needed statewide. 13 e. Recommendations for voluntary methods, to decrease risks 14 and adverse impacts associated with flooding, anticipated 15 changes in water supply, and natural hazards as identified in 16 the statewide risk assessment, including all of the following: 17 (1) Strategies for overcoming identified gaps in state and 18 local government capacity to address hazard risk, including all 19 of the following: 20 (a) Community education and communication concerning local 21 hazard risk reduction. 22 (b) Improvement of coordination of hazard risk reduction 23 efforts across state agencies. 24 (c) Operations and maintenance for existing projects. 25 (d) Technical assistance and other support to local 26 governments. 27 (2) Statutory or regulatory remedies for managing risk. 28 (3) Expected implementation timelines, agency involvement, 29 and implementation costs for each action or remedy. 30 (4) Existing and potential funding sources for facilitating 31 resilience planning and projects. 32 (5) Possible cobenefits associated with resilience actions. 33 (6) Plans for integrating recommended approaches to risk 34 reduction into existing state strategies for hazard mitigation, 35 -4- HF 2511 (3) 91 sb/js/md 4/ 5 H.F. 2511 environmental protection, and economic opportunity and 1 development. 2 f. Metrics for tracking, reporting progress to state and 3 local policymakers, and updating the Iowa state resilience 4 plan. 5 4. On completion of the Iowa state resilience plan, the 6 Iowa flood center shall deliver the plan to the governor, the 7 general assembly, and the department of homeland security and 8 emergency management. 9 5. The Iowa flood center shall deliver a report to the 10 governor and general assembly by December 31, 2029, and every 11 two years thereafter. The report shall include all of the 12 following: 13 a. A summary of the progress made on recommendations 14 and identified projects in the plan during the previous two 15 calendar years. 16 b. Updated recommendations based on the information gathered 17 by the Iowa flood center, if applicable. 18 c. Strategies to increase resilience in the state, including 19 identifying potential funding sources for those strategies. 20 6. The Iowa flood center, in coordination with the 21 department of transportation, economic development authority, 22 department of homeland security and emergency management, 23 department of agriculture and land stewardship, department of 24 natural resources, and any other stakeholder deemed relevant by 25 the Iowa flood center, shall update the Iowa state resilience 26 plan every five years or sooner. 27 -5- HF 2511 (3) 91 sb/js/md 5/ 5